North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 11A. Modification And Termination Of Irrevocable Trusts.

§§ 36A-125.1 through 36A-125.12.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

Editor’s Note.

Prior to repeal of this Article, G.S. 36A-126 through 36A-129 had been set out as reserved for future codification purposes.